Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-525
Convictions; suspension of license and registration; renewal; financial responsibility.

Where proof of financial responsibility is required by section 60-524 such license and registration shall remain suspended or revoked and shall not at any time thereafter be renewed nor shall any license be thereafter issued to such person, nor shall any motor vehicle be thereafter registered in the name of such person until permitted under the motor vehicle laws of this state and not then unless and until he shall give and shall maintain for three years proof of financial responsibility.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 25, p. 493;

Laws 1959, c. 298, § 15, p. 1119;

Laws 1963, c. 363, § 1, p. 1158.

A license to operate a motor vehicle when suspended or revoked retains that status until a new license is procured. State v. Smith, 181 Neb. 846, 152 N.W.2d 16 (1967).